Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.030

Assessment district—Zones.

For the purpose of ascertaining the amount to be assessed against each separate lot, tract, parcel of land or other property therein, the local improvement district or utility local improvement district shall be divided into subdivisions or zones paralleling the margin of the street, avenue, lane, alley, boulevard, park drive, parkway, public place or public square to be improved, numbered respectively first, second, third, fourth, and fifth.

The first subdivision shall include all lands within the district lying between the street margins and lines drawn parallel therewith and thirty feet therefrom.

The second subdivision shall include all lands within the district lying between lines drawn parallel with and thirty and sixty feet respectively from the street margins.

The third subdivision shall include all lands within the district lying between lines drawn parallel with and sixty and ninety feet respectively from the street margins.

The fourth subdivision shall include all lands, if any, within the district lying between lines drawn parallel with and ninety and one hundred twenty feet respectively from the street margins.

The fifth subdivision shall include all lands, if any, within the district lying between a line drawn parallel with and one hundred twenty feet from the street margin and the outer limit of the improvement district.

[ 1967 c 52 s 10; 1965 c 7 s 35.44.030. Prior: 1957 c 144 s 17; prior: 1947 c 155 s 1, part; 1941 c 90 s 1, part; 1915 c 168 s 2, part; 1911 c 98 s 13, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9365, part.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1967 c 52: See notes following RCW 35.43.042.